Washington statutes.
RCW 18.205.130

Waiver of examination—Certification of applicants—Intent.

(1) Within two years after July 1, 1999, the secretary shall waive the examination and certify a person who pays a fee and produces a valid chemical dependency counselor certificate of qualification from the department of social and health services.

(2) Within two years after July 1, 1999, the secretary shall waive the examination and certify applicants who are licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW or under chapter 18.79 RCW as *advanced registered nurse practitioners who pay a fee, who document completion of courses substantially equivalent to those required of chemical dependency counselors working in programs approved under **chapter 70.96A RCW on July 1, 1999, and who provide evidence of one thousand five hundred hours of experience in chemical dependency counseling.

(3) It is the intent of the legislature that the credentialing of chemical dependency professionals be established solely by the department.

[ 1998 c 243 s 13.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

**(2) Chapter 70.96A RCW was repealed and/or recodified in its entirety pursuant to 2016 sp.s. c 29 ss 301, 601, and 701.